Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SOUTH ST. PAUL; SWIMMING POOL AND AQUATICS CENTER.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of South St. Paul to predesign and design a new swimming pool and aquatics center. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end